Massachusetts, session 194th, H864.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 45 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
An official voting ballot and the accompanying papers shall be mailed postage prepaid 
and with return postage guaranteed to each registered voter or, if the voter so requests, delivered 
when called for at the office of the clerk, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of section 
91B.